Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204D.08, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. State partisan primary ballot; party columns. The state partisan primary ballot shall be headed by the words "State Partisan Primary Ballot." The ballot shall be printed on white paper. There must be at least three vertical columns on the ballot and each major political party shall have a separate column headed by the words ".......... Party," giving the party name. Above the party names, the following statement shall be printed. "Minnesota Election Law permits you to vote for the candidates of only one political party in a state partisan primary election." If there are only two major political parties to be listed on the ballot, one party must occupy the left-hand column, the other party must occupy the right-hand column, and the center column must contain the following statement: "Do not vote for candidates of more than one party." The names of the candidates seeking the nomination of each major political party shall be listed in that party's column. If only one individual files an affidavit of candidacy seeking the nomination of a major political party for an office, the name of that individual shall be placed on the state partisan primary ballot at the appropriate location in that party's column. In each column, the candidates for senator in Congress shall be listed first, candidates for representative in Congress second, deleted text begin candidates for state senator third, candidates for state representative fourthdeleted text end and then candidates for new text begin partisan new text end state office in the order specified by the secretary of state. Vacant offices being filled by special election must be listed with other offices of that type, but after any office of that type for which a candidate will be elected for a full term. The party columns shall be substantially the same in width, type, and appearance. The columns shall be separated by a 12-point solid line. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204D.08, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. State and county nonpartisan primary ballot. The state and county nonpartisan primary ballot shall be headed "State and County Nonpartisan Primary Ballot." It shall be printed in the manner provided in the rules of the secretary of state. The names of candidates for nomination to the supreme court, court of appeals, district court, new text begin state senator, state representative, new text end all county offices, all city offices, and all school district offices shall be placed on this ballot. No candidate whose name is placed on the state and county nonpartisan primary ballot shall be designated or identified as the candidate of any political party or in any other manner except as expressly provided by law. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204D.13, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Order of offices. The candidates for partisan offices shall be placed on the state general election ballot in the following order: senator in Congress shall be firstdeleted text begin ;deleted text end new text begin andnew text end representative in Congress, seconddeleted text begin ; state senator, third; and state representative, fourthdeleted text end . The candidates for new text begin partisan new text end state offices shall follow in the order specified by the secretary of state. Candidates for governor and lieutenant governor shall appear so that a single vote may be cast for both offices. Vacant offices being filled by special election must be listed with other offices of that type, but after any office of that type for which a candidate will be elected for a full term. Sec. 4. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 to 3 are effective August 1, 2026, and apply to elections conducted on or after that date. new text end